de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Schraubendreher: Schlitzschraubendreher; Kreuzschlitzschraubendreher; Torx-Schraubendreher
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > ドライバー: マイナスドライバー; プラスドライバー; トルクスドライバー
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Odvijači: Ravni odvijači; Phillips odvijači; Torx odvijači
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Κατσαβίδια: Ίσια κατσαβίδια; Σταυροκατσάβιδα; Κατσαβίδια για βίδες ΤΧ (torx)
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Chaves de fenda: Chaves de fenda ponta chata; Chaves de fenda Phillips; Chaves de fenda Torx
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > ไขควง: ไขควงปากแบน; ไขควงปากแฉก; ไขควงหัวดาว
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Skruetrækkere: Flade skruetrækkere; Stjerneskruetrækkere; Torx-skruetrækkere
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Tornavidalar: Düz Uçlu Tornavidalar; Yıldız Tornavidalar; Tork Tornavidalar
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Csavarhúzók: Laposfejű csavarhúzók; Phillips csavarhúzók; Torx csavarhúzók
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Șurubelnițe: Șurubelnițe cu cap plat; Șurubelnițe Phillips; Șurubelnițe Torx
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Cacciaviti: Cacciaviti a testa piatta; Cacciaviti a croce; Cacciaviti Torx
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Izvijači: Ploščati izvijači; Križni izvijač tipa Phillips; Izvijači torx
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Atsuktuvai: Atsuktuvai plokščia galvute; Atsuktuvai kryžmine galvute; Atsuktuvai žvaigždine galvute
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Skruvmejslar: Plattskruvmejslar; Stjärnskruvmejslar; Torx-skruvmejslar
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 螺丝刀: 一字螺丝刀; 十字螺丝刀; 梅花螺丝刀
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Chaves de parafuso: Chaves de fenda de cabeça chata; Chaves de fenda Phillips; Chaves de fenda torx
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Schroevendraaiers: Platte schroevendraaiers; Phillips-schroevendraaiers; Torx-schroevendraaiers
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Śrubokręty: Śrubokręty płaskie; Śrubokręty krzyżakowe; Śrubokręty gwiazdkowe
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Tournevis et visseuses: Tournevis à tête plate; Tournevis Phillips; Tournevis Torx
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Šroubováky: Ploché šroubováky; Křížové šroubováky; Torx šroubováky
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Skrutrekkere: Flathodeskrutrekkere; Phillips-skrutrekkere; Torx-skrutrekkere
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Отвертки: Шлицевые отвертки; Крестовые отвертки; Звездообразные отвертки
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Tua vít: Tua vít đầu dẹt; Tua vít đầu chữ thập; Tua vít đầu Torx
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Отвертки: Прави отвертки; Кръстати отвертки; Отвертки Torx
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 螺絲起子: 一字螺絲起子; 十字螺絲起子; 梅花螺絲起子
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Ruuvimeisselit: Tasapääruuvimeisselit; Ristipääruuvimeisselit; Torx-ruuvimeisselit
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Skrutkovače: Ploché skrutkovače; Skrutkovače Phillips; Skrutkovače Torx
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Destornilladores: Destornilladores de cabeza plana; Destornilladores Phillips; Destornilladores Torx
en: Hardware > Tools > Screwdrivers: Flathead Screwdrivers; Phillips Screwdrivers; Torx Screwdrivers
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 드라이버: 일자 드라이버; 십자 드라이버; 별 드라이버